Florida, session 2026, SB430.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.âSection 1012.591, Florida Statutes, is created 17 to read: 18 1012.591âOath of school personnel.âBefore entering upon the 19 duties of a member of the instructional or administrative 20 personnel as defined in s. 1012.01(2) and (3), respectively, or 21 of a prekindergarten instructor as defined in s. 1002.51(6), a 22 person must subscribe to the following oath: 23 24 I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will support, 25 protect, and defend the Constitution and Government of 26 the United States and the Constitution and Government 27 of the State of Florida; that I am duly qualified for 28 employment as a member of the school personnel in this 29 state; that I will well and faithfully perform the 30 duties of a member of the school personnel in a 31 professional, independent, objective, and nonpartisan 32 manner; that I will uphold the highest standards of 33 academic integrity and professional ethics; that I 34 will foster a respectful learning environment for all 35 students which promotes critical thinking, civic 36 responsibility, and lifelong learning; and that I will 37 serve as a positive role model in both conduct and 38 character, so help me God. 39 Section 2.âSection 1012.802, Florida Statutes, is created 40 to read: 41 1012.802âOath of administrative and instructional 42 employees.âBefore entering upon the duties of a person employed 43 in an administrative or instructional capacity of a Florida 44 College System institution or state university, a person 45 employed in such capacity must subscribe to the following oath: 46 47 I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will support, 48 protect, and defend the Constitution and Government of 49 the United States and the Constitution and Government 50 of the State of Florida; that I am duly qualified as a 51 person employed in an administrative or instructional 52 capacity in this state; that I will well and 53 faithfully perform the duties of a person employed in 54 an administrative or instructional capacity in a 55 professional, independent, objective, and nonpartisan 56 manner; that I will uphold the highest standards of 57 academic integrity and professional ethics; that I 58 will foster a respectful learning environment for all 59 students which promotes critical thinking, civic 60 responsibility, and lifelong learning; and that I will 61 serve as a positive role model in both conduct and 62 character, so help me God. 63 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.